test/src/morphology/N-ngudi_gt-norm.yaml
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈудав 
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈудар  
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈудада 
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈудамиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈудариʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈудадиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈудаваˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈудараˮ
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ӈудадоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈудахаюн  
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈудахаюд  
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈудахаюда 
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈудахаюниʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈудахаюдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈудахаюдиʼ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈудахаюнаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈудахаюдаˮ
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ӈудахаюдоʼ
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈудин   
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈудид   
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈудида  
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈудиниʼ 
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈудидиʼ 
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈудидиʼ 
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈудинаˮ 
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈудидаˮ 
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ӈудидоʼ 
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈудавась
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈударась
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈудадась
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈудаминзь
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈударинзь
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈудадинзь
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈудаваць
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈудараць
     ӈуда+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ӈудадонзь
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈудахаюнась
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈудахаюдась
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈудахаюдась
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈудахаюнинзь
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈудахаюдинзь
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈудахаюдинзь
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈудахаюнаць
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈудахаюдаць
     ӈуда+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ӈудахаюдонзь
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈудинась
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈудидась
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈудидась
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈудининзь
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈудидинзь
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈудидинзь
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈудинаць
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈудидаць
     ӈуда+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ӈудидонзь
